Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65 Guardians Generally
Court properly appointed an incapacitated person's brother, rather than her daughter, to be her guardian as the two had a loving brother and sister bond, they had a long history of working well in a business enterprise, and the brother had been a constant in the incapacitated person's life and had helped in providing for her care; further, the daughter had a long period of estrangement from her mother precipitated by her absconding to California with $46,000 of her mother's money and, after she reentered her mother's life, she made it difficult for others to see her mother and made unfounded accusations of theft. Martin v. Decker, 96 Ark. App. 45, 237 S.W.3d 502 (2006).

Trial court properly found it was in a child's best interests to appoint a paternal aunt and uncle as guardians, in accordance with §28-65-210, rather than the maternal grandfather, because even though both parties satisfied the preferential status under subdivision (b)(4) of this section, any preferential status was subservient to the best interests analysis performed by the trial court; although the father was not qualified to be the guardian, the father wanted the child placed with the aunt and uncle.Smith v. Lovelace, 2011 Ark. App. 74, 380 S.W.3d 514 (2011), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Ark. App. LEXIS 221 (Mar. 16, 2011), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Ark. LEXIS 402 (Ark. Apr. 7, 2011).

Order appointing the mother's aunt and uncle guardian of the minor child was proper because the father's parents did not have standing to argue that the trial court erred in denying the father's motion to vacate; a U.S. Const. Amend. VI right to counsel was not cognizable in ordinary civil cases; §28-65-207(a)(3) provided that notice need not be given to any person who actually appeared at the hearing; and there was no evidence that the trial court ignored the father's wishes, as required by subsection (b) of this section.Light v. Duvall, 2011 Ark. App. 535, 385 S.W.3d 399 (2011).

Denial of the aunt and uncle's petition for guardianship over the minor children was improper under subsection (a) of this section because the children would be required to primarily reside in the same residence with a man who pled guilty to inflicting severe burns on the younger of them, and with their mother who, at the very least, did nothing to prevent the abuse despite evidence that other instances of abuse had occurred.Gammill v. Hoover, 2011 Ark. App. 788 (2011).

Subsection (a) of this section, the natural parent preference statute, did not require a grandmother seeking custody of her grandchildren to prove that the children's natural mother was an unfit mother. The best interest of the children was served by placement with their grandmother, given evidence that the children were dirty, flea-bitten, and injured when they returned from their mother's home.Furr v. James, 2013 Ark. App. 181, 427 S.W.3d 94 (2013).

Despite the statutory preference for a parent, a grandparent was appointed as a guardian since the trial court was not satisfied that the mother was suitable; the trial court noted the mother's “voiced skepticism” with respect to allegations of sexual abuse in clear contradiction of the child's counselor, her continued significant social contact with the alleged perpetrator, and a lack of stability in the mother's life and home.Sherland v. Sherland, 2015 Ark. App. 342, 465 S.W.3d 3 (2015).

Circuit court properly awarded the grandmother's petition for guardianship because the grandmother was not required to prove that the mother was unfit; there was a mountain of evidence presented in the case to demonstrate that the mother was unsuitable, and the circuit court found that the mother poisoned the minds of the children and and coached them to make untrue statements.Mossholder v. Coker, 2017 Ark. App. 279, 521 S.W.3d 150 (2017).

Mother lacked standing to challenge the guardianship petition based on the failure to serve the biological father or find him unfit.Reagan v. Dodson, 2016 Ark. App. 598, 509 S.W.3d 654 (2016).

Cited: Hooks v. Pratte, 53 Ark. App. 161, 920 S.W.2d 24 (1996); Reynolds v. Guardianship of Sears, 327 Ark. 770, 940 S.W.2d 483 (1997); Troeskyn v. Herrington (In re S.H.), 2012 Ark. 245, 409 S.W.3d 307 (2012).

The residence and post office address of the person whom the petitioner asks to be appointed guardian;

The names and addresses, so far as known or can be reasonably ascertained, of the persons most closely related to the incapacitated person by blood or marriage;

The name and address of the person or institution having the care and custody of the incapacitated person;

The names and addresses of wards for whom any natural person whose appointment is sought is already guardian;

The reasons why the appointment of a guardian is sought and the interest of the petitioner in the appointment;

A statement of the respondent's alleged disability;

A recommendation proposing the type, scope, and duration of guardianship;

A statement that any facility or agency from which the respondent is receiving services has been notified of the proceedings; and

The names and addresses of others having knowledge about the person's disability.

The appointment of a guardian for an incompetent veteran confined in a state hospital for nervous diseases, made in vacation, but confirmed during term by an adopting order previously made, was not void. Lingo v. Rainwater, 199 Ark. 618, 136 S.W.2d 161 (1940) (decision under prior law).

If an order appointing a guardian for an incompetent veteran was void, the person appointed would be an equitable or de facto guardian, a probate court's order approving his settlement would be void, and on appeal a circuit court would not have jurisdiction. Lingo v. Rainwater, 199 Ark. 618, 136 S.W.2d 161 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Where an alleged incompetent was a citizen of the county in which a petition for appointment of guardian was filed and was confined in an out of state asylum and those matters were determined by the court, but through clerical misprision were omitted from the recorded judgment, the judgment appointing the guardian was valid. Sanders v. Omohundro, 204 Ark. 1040, 166 S.W.2d 657 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Notice to a minor under 14 years of age of the appointment of his father as guardian was not essential to the validity of such an appointment. Swindle v. Rogers, 188 Ark. 503, 66 S.W.2d 630 (1934) (decision under prior law).

Where the petition for appointment of a guardian merely stated that a person was unable to care for herself because of physical impairment, the probate court had no jurisdiction to appoint a guardian for such a person, at least under the law at the time of the guardianship proceeding. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979) (decision under prior law).

Where a petition for the appointment of a guardian of person committed to an insane asylum was filed, the probate court acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian, insanity was presumed from the fact of confinement in an asylum, and such proceeding was not a denial of due process. Sanders v. Omohundro, 204 Ark. 1040, 166 S.W.2d 657 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Child was in the Department of Human Services'custody pursuant to a court order, and the department filed a petition to appoint the father as guardian; the mother made no persuasive argument that the department was not a proper party to petition for guardianship.Kantor v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 402, 559 S.W.3d 747 (2018).

Because the mother was aggrieved by the order, which denied her petition for guardianship, she had standing.Kantor v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 402, 559 S.W.3d 747 (2018).

Cited: Kuelbs v. Hill, 2010 Ark. App. 427, 379 S.W.3d 47 (2010).

History.

Acts 2017, No. 667, § 5.